Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 273.13, subdivision 34, is amended to read: Subd. 34. Homestead of veteran with a disability or family caregiver. (a) All or a portion of the market value of property owned by a veteran and serving as the veteran's homestead under this section is excluded in determining the property's taxable market value if the veteran has a service-connected disability of 70 percent or more as certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs. deleted text begin To qualify for exclusion under this subdivision, the veteran must have been honorably discharged from the United States armed forces, as indicated by United States Government Form DD214 or other official military discharge papers.deleted text end (b)(1) For a disability rating of 70 percent or more, deleted text begin $150,000deleted text end new text begin the amountnew text end of market value deleted text begin isdeleted text end excludednew text begin is the exclusion base amountnew text end , except as provided in clause (2); and (2) for a total (100 percent) and permanent disability, deleted text begin $300,000deleted text end new text begin the amountnew text end of market value deleted text begin isdeleted text end excludednew text begin is two times the exclusion base amountnew text end . new text begin For the purposes of this paragraph, the exclusion base amount for assessment year 2026 is $200,000. For assessment year 2027 and thereafter, the exclusion base amount is adjusted annually by multiplying the exclusion base amount for the prior assessment year by the sum of one plus the percentage increase, if any, in the implicit price deflator for government consumption expenditures and gross investment for state and local governments prepared by the Bureau of Economic Analysis of the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period ending March 31 of the prior assessment year. new text end (c) If a veteran with a disability qualifying for a valuation exclusion under paragraph (b), clause (2), predeceases the veteran's spouse, and if upon the death of the veteran the spouse holds the legal or beneficial title to the homestead and permanently resides there, the exclusion shall carry over to the benefit of the veteran's spouse until such time as the spouse deleted text begin remarries, ordeleted text end sells, transfers, or otherwise disposes of the property, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (n). Qualification under this paragraph requires an application under paragraph (h), and a spouse must notify the assessor if there is a change in the deleted text begin spouse's marital status,deleted text end ownership of the propertydeleted text begin ,deleted text end or use of the property as a permanent residence. (d) If the spouse of a member of any branch or unit of the United States armed forces who dies due to a service-connected cause while serving honorably in active service, as indicated on United States Government Form DD1300 or DD2064, holds the legal or beneficial title to a homestead and permanently resides there, the spouse is entitled to the benefit described in paragraph (b), clause (2), until such time as the spouse deleted text begin remarries ordeleted text end sells, transfers, or otherwise disposes of the property, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (n).new text begin If the death of the service member occurred while the service member and the spouse lived outside of Minnesota, the surviving spouse is eligible for the exclusion pursuant to this paragraph. The exclusion may be applied to the surviving spouse's homestead at the time of initial application, until such time as the spouse sells, transfers, or otherwise disposes of the property, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (n).new text end (e) If a veteran meets the disability criteria of paragraph (a) but does not own property classified as homestead in the state of Minnesota, then the homestead of the veteran's primary family caregiver, if any, is eligible for the exclusion that the veteran would otherwise qualify for under paragraph (b). (f) In the case of an agricultural homestead, only the portion of the property consisting of the house and garage and immediately surrounding one acre of land qualifies for the valuation exclusion under this subdivision. (g) A property qualifying for a valuation exclusion under this subdivision is not eligible for the market value exclusion under subdivision 35, or classification under subdivision 22, paragraph (b). (h) To qualify for a valuation exclusion under this subdivision a property owner must apply to the assessor by December 31 of the first assessment year for which the exclusion is sought. Except as provided in paragraph (c), the owner of a property that has been accepted for a valuation exclusion must notify the assessor if there is a change in ownership of the property or in the use of the property as a homestead. (i) A first-time application by a qualifying spouse for the market value exclusion under paragraph (d) deleted text begin must be made any time within two years ofdeleted text end new text begin may be filed any time afternew text end the death of the service member.new text begin A qualifying spouse whose application was previously denied may reapply pursuant to this paragraph for the exclusion to begin in the current assessment year.new text end (j) For purposes of this subdivision: (1) "active service" has the meaning given in section 190.05; (2) "own" means that the person's name is present as an owner on the property deed; (3) "primary family caregiver" means a person who is approved by the secretary of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs for assistance as the primary provider of personal care services for an eligible veteran under the Program of Comprehensive Assistance for Family Caregivers, codified as United States Code, title 38, section 1720G; and (4) "veteran" deleted text begin has the meaning given the term indeleted text end new text begin means a person defined undernew text end section 197.447new text begin or a service member who has not been dischargednew text end . (k) If a veteran did not apply for or receive the exclusion under paragraph (b), clause (2), before dying, or the exclusion under paragraph (b), clause (2), did not exist at the time of the veterans death, the veteran's spouse is entitled to the benefit under paragraph (b), clause (2), until the spouse deleted text begin remarries ordeleted text end sells, transfers, or otherwise disposes of the property, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (n), if: (1) the spouse files a first-time application; (2) upon the death of the veteran, the spouse holds the legal or beneficial title to the homestead and permanently resides there;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (3) the veteran met the honorable discharge requirements of paragraph (a); and deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end the United States Department of Veterans Affairs certifies that: (i) the veteran met the total (100 percent) and permanent disability requirement under paragraph (b), clause (2); or (ii) the spouse has been awarded dependency and indemnity compensation. (l) The purpose of this provision of law providing a level of homestead property tax relief for veterans with a disability, their primary family caregivers, and their surviving spouses is to help ease the burdens of war for those among our state's citizens who bear those burdens most heavily. (m) By July 1, the county veterans service officer must certify the disability rating and permanent address of each veteran receiving the benefit under paragraph (b) to the assessor. (n) A spouse who received the benefit in paragraph (c), (d), or (k) but no longer holds the legal or beneficial title to the property may continue to receive the exclusion for a property other than the property for which the exclusion was initially granted until the spouse deleted text begin remarries ordeleted text end sells, transfers, or otherwise disposes of the property, provided that: (1) the spouse applies under paragraph (h) for the continuation of the exclusion allowed under this paragraph; (2) the spouse holds the legal or beneficial title to the property for which the continuation of the exclusion is sought under this paragraph, and permanently resides there;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (3) the estimated market value of the property for which the exclusion is sought under this paragraph is less than or equal to the estimated market value of the property that first received the exclusion, based on the value of each property on the date of the sale of the property that first received the exclusion; and deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end the spouse has not previously received the benefit under this paragraph for a property other than the property for which the exclusion is sought. (o) If a spouse had previously received the exclusion under paragraph (c) or (d) and the exclusion expired prior to taxes payable in 2020, the spouse may reapply under this section for the exclusion under paragraph (c) or (d). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for assessment year 2026 and thereafter. new text end